Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-120
Governor; succession to office.

If the Lieutenant Governor or Speaker of the Legislature becomes incapable of performing the duties of Governor as provided by Article IV, section 16, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the duties of Governor shall be performed in the following order: Chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, Chairperson of Committee on Committees, Chairperson of Committee on Judiciary, Chairperson of Committee on Government, Military and Veterans Affairs, Chairperson of Committee on Appropriations, Chairperson of Committee on Revenue, Chairperson of Committee on Education, Chairperson of Committee on Banking, Commerce and Insurance, Chairperson of Committee on Natural Resources, Chairperson of Committee on Agriculture, Chairperson of Committee on Health and Human Services, Chairperson of Committee on General Affairs, Chairperson of Committee on Urban Affairs, Chairperson of Committee on Business and Labor, and Chairperson of Committee on Transportation, until the vacancy is filled.

Laws 1959, c. 499, § 1, p. 1499;

Laws 1961, c. 451, § 2, p. 1378;

Laws 1969, c. 831, § 1, p. 3153;

Laws 1974, LB 596, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 965, § 5.